Illinois, session 104th, HB3866.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 11-4.1 and 19A-10.5 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/11-4.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-4.1)7    Sec. 11-4.1. (a) In appointing polling places under this 8Article, the county board or board of election commissioners 9shall, insofar as they are convenient and available, use 10schools and other public buildings as polling places.11    (b) Upon request of the county board or board of election 12commissioners, the proper agency of government (including 13school districts and units of local government) shall make a 14public building under its control available for use as a 15polling place on an election day and for a reasonably 16necessary time before and after election day, without charge. 17If the county board or board of election commissioners chooses 18a school to be a polling place, then the school district must 19make the school available for use as a polling place. However, 20for the day of the election, a school district is encouraged to 21(i) close the school or (ii) hold a teachers institute on that 22day with students not in attendance.23    (c) A government agency which makes a public building   HB3866- 2 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1under its control available for use as a polling place shall 2(i) ensure the portion of the building to be used as the 3polling place is accessible to voters with disabilities and 4elderly voters and (ii) allow the election authority to 5administer the election as authorized under this Code.6    (d) If a qualified elector's precinct polling place is a 7school and the elector will be unable to enter that polling 8place without violating Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 92012 because the elector is a child sex offender as defined in 10Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012, that elector may 11vote by a vote by mail ballot in accordance with Article 19 of 12this Code or may vote early in accordance with Article 19A of 13this Code.14(Source: P.A. 98-773, eff. 7-18-14; 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 1599-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 16    (10 ILCS 5/19A-10.5)17    Sec. 19A-10.5. Child sex offenders. If an election 18authority designates one or more permanent early voting 19polling places under this Article, the election authority must 20designate at least one permanent early voting polling place 21that a qualified elector who is a child sex offender as defined 22in Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012 may enter 23without violating Section 11-9.3 of that Code.24    If an election authority designates one or more temporary 25early voting polling places under this Article, the election   HB3866- 3 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1authority must designate at least one temporary early voting 2polling place that a qualified elector who is a child sex 3offender as defined in Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 42012 may enter without violating Section 11-9.3 of that Code.5(Source: P.A. 97-1150, eff. 1-25-13.) 6    Section 10. The Park District Code is amended by changing 7Section 8-23a as follows: 8    (70 ILCS 1205/8-23a)9    Sec. 8-23a. Application for volunteers; disclosure of 10child sex offenses; penalty for failure to disclose.11    (a) For purposes of this Section:12    "Sex Child sex offender" has the meaning provided in 13paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 11-9.3 of the 14Criminal Code of 2012.15    "Volunteer" means any individual who without compensation 16or benefits reports to, and is under the direct supervision 17of, a park district's administrative staff and provides 18personal services to a park district recreational program that 19is offered to children. 20    (b) Every park district shall require volunteers to 21complete an application prior to beginning any work as a 22volunteer. The application shall include, but shall not be 23limited to, a question for the applicant to answer concerning 24whether they have been convicted of or found to be a child sex   HB3866- 4 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1offender as defined in Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 22012. If a volunteer is under 18 years of age, the volunteer's 3parent or legal guardian may complete the application on 4behalf of the volunteer. No park district shall knowingly 5engage a volunteer who has been convicted of or found to be a 6child sex offender as defined in Section 11-9.3 of the 7Criminal Code of 2012 and shall terminate the services of the 8volunteer upon discovery of such an offender.9    (c) If a current volunteer with a park district is 10convicted of or found to be a child sex offender as defined in 11Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012, the volunteer 12shall immediately disclose the conviction or finding to the 13park district.14(Source: P.A. 100-472, eff. 9-8-17.) 15    Section 15. The School Code is amended by changing 16Sections 2-3.25f-5 and 34-4 as follows: 17    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.25f-5)18    Sec. 2-3.25f-5. Independent Authority.19    (a) The General Assembly finds all of the following:20        (1) A fundamental goal of the people of this State, as 21    expressed in Section 1 of Article X of the Illinois 22    Constitution, is the educational development of all 23    persons to the limits of their capacities. When a school 24    board faces governance difficulties, continued operation   HB3866- 5 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1    of the public school system is threatened.2        (2) Sound school board governance, academic 3    achievement, and sound financial structure are essential 4    to the continued operation of any school system. It is 5    vital to commercial, educational, and cultural interests 6    that public schools remain in operation. To achieve that 7    goal, public school systems must have effective 8    leadership.9        (3) To promote the sound operation of districts, as 10    defined in this Section, it may be necessary to provide 11    for the creation of independent authorities with the 12    powers necessary to promote sound governance, sound 13    academic planning, and sound financial management and to 14    ensure the continued operation of the public schools.15        (4) It is the purpose of this Section to provide for a 16    sound basis for the continued operation of public schools. 17    The intention of the General Assembly, in creating this 18    Section, is to establish procedures, provide powers, and 19    impose restrictions to ensure the educational integrity of 20    public school districts.21    (b) As used in this Section:22    "Board" means a school board of a district.23    "Chairperson" means the Chairperson of the Independent 24Authority.25    "District" means any school district having a population 26of not more than 500,000.  HB3866- 6 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1    "State Board" means the State Board of Education.2    "State Superintendent" means the State Superintendent of 3Education.4    (c) The State Board has the power to direct the State 5Superintendent to remove a board. Boards may be removed when 6the criteria provided for in subsection (d) of this Section 7are met. At no one time may the State Board remove more than 4 8school boards and establish Independent Authorities pursuant 9to subsection (e) of this Section.10    If the State Board proposes to direct the State 11Superintendent to remove a board from a district, board 12members shall receive individual written notice of the 13intended removal. Written notice must be provided at least 30 14calendar days before a hearing is held by the State Board. This 15notice shall identify the basis for proposed removal.16    Board members are entitled to a hearing, during which time 17each board member shall have the opportunity to respond 18individually, both orally and through written comments, to the 19basis laid out in the notice. Written comments must be 20submitted to the State Board on or before the hearing.21    Board members are entitled to be represented by counsel at 22the hearing, but counsel must not be paid with district funds, 23unless the State Board decides that the board will not be 24removed and then the board members may be reimbursed for all 25reasonable attorney's fees by the district.26    The State Board shall make a final decision on removal   HB3866- 7 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1immediately following the hearing or at its next regularly 2scheduled or special meeting. In no event may the decision be 3made later than the next regularly scheduled meeting.4    The State Board shall issue a final written decision. If 5the State Board directs the State Superintendent to remove the 6board, the State Superintendent shall do so within 30 days 7after the written decision. Following the removal of the 8board, the State Superintendent shall establish an Independent 9Authority pursuant to subsection (e) of this Section.10    If there is a financial oversight panel operating in the 11district pursuant to Article 1B or 1H of this Code, the State 12Board may, at its discretion, abolish the panel.13    (d) The State Board may require districts with one or more 14schools in Intensive Support status that have been identified 15as having deficiencies in one or more core functions of the 16needs assessment, as described in subsection (b-5) of Section 172-3.25f of this Code, to seek accreditation through an 18independent accreditation organization chosen by the State 19Board and paid for by the State. The State Board may direct the 20State Superintendent to remove board members pursuant to 21subsection (c) of this Section in any district in which the 22district is unable to obtain accreditation in whole or in part 23due to reasons specifically related to school board 24governance. When determining if a district has failed to meet 25the standards for accreditation specifically related to school 26board governance, the accreditation entity shall take into   HB3866- 8 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1account the overall academic, fiscal, and operational 2condition of the district and consider whether the board has 3failed to protect district assets, to direct sound 4administrative and academic policy, to abide by basic 5governance principles, including those set forth in district 6policies, and to conduct itself with professionalism and care 7and in a legally, ethically, and financially responsible 8manner. When considering if a board has failed in these areas, 9the accreditation entity shall consider some or all of the 10following factors:11        (1) Failure to protect district assets by, without 12    limitation, incidents of fiscal fraud or misappropriation 13    of district funds; acts of neglecting the district's 14    building conditions; a failure to meet regularly 15    scheduled, payroll-period obligations when due; a failure 16    to abide by competitive bidding laws; a failure to prevent 17    an audit finding of material internal control weaknesses; 18    a failure to comply with required accounting principles; a 19    failure to develop and implement a comprehensive, 20    risk-management plan; a failure to provide financial 21    information or cooperate with the State Superintendent; or 22    a failure to file an annual financial report, an annual 23    budget, a deficit reduction plan, or other financial 24    information as required by law.25        (2) Failure to direct sound administrative and 26    academic policy by, without limitation, hiring staff who   HB3866- 9 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1    do not meet minimal certification requirements for the 2    positions being filled or who do not meet the customary 3    qualifications held by those occupying similar positions 4    in other school districts; a failure to avoid conflicts of 5    interest as it relates to hiring or other contractual 6    obligations; a failure to provide minimum graduation 7    requirements and curricular requirements of the School 8    Code and regulations; a failure to provide a minimum 9    school term as required by law; or a failure to adopt and 10    implement policies and practices that promote conditions 11    that support student learning, effective instruction, and 12    assessment that produce equitable and challenging learning 13    experiences for all students.14        (3) Failure to abide by basic governance principles 15    by, without limitation, a failure to comply with the 16    mandated oath of office; a failure to adopt and abide by 17    sound local governance policies; a failure to abide by the 18    principle that official action by the board occurs only 19    through a duly-called and legally conducted meeting of the 20    board; a failure to abide by majority decisions of the 21    board; a failure to protect the privacy of students; a 22    failure to ensure that board decisions and actions are in 23    accordance with defined roles and responsibilities; or a 24    failure of the board to protect, support, and respect the 25    autonomy of a system to accomplish goals for improvement 26    in student learning and instruction and to manage   HB3866- 10 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1    day-to-day operations of the school system and its 2    schools, including maintaining the distinction between the 3    board's roles and responsibilities and those of 4    administrative leadership.5        (4) Failure to conduct itself in a legally, ethically, 6    and financially responsible manner by, without limitation, 7    a failure to act in accordance with the Constitution of 8    the United States of America and the Constitution of the 9    State of Illinois and within the scope of State and 10    federal laws; laws, including a failure to comply with 11    provisions of the School Code, the Open Meetings Act, and 12    the Freedom of Information Act and federal and State laws 13    that protect the rights of protected categories of 14    students; a failure to comply with all district policies 15    and procedures and all State rules; or a failure to comply 16    with the governmental entities provisions of the State 17    Officials and Employees Ethics Act, including the gift ban 18    and prohibited political activities provisions.19    (e) Upon removal of the board, the State Superintendent 20shall establish an Independent Authority. Upon establishment 21of an Independent Authority, there is established a body both 22corporate and politic to be known as the "(Name of the School 23District) Independent Authority", which in this name shall 24exercise all of the authority vested in an Independent 25Authority by this Section and by the name may sue and be sued 26in all courts and places where judicial proceedings are had.  HB3866- 11 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1    (f) Upon establishment of an Independent Authority under 2subsection (e) of this Section, the State Superintendent 3shall, within 30 working days thereafter and in consultation 4with State and locally elected officials, appoint 5 or 7 5members to serve on an Independent Authority for the district. 6Members appointed to the Independent Authority shall serve at 7the pleasure of the State Superintendent. The State 8Superintendent shall designate one of the members of the 9Independent Authority to serve as its chairperson. In the 10event of vacancy or resignation, the State Superintendent 11shall, within 15 working days after receiving notice, appoint 12a successor to serve out that member's term. If the State Board 13has abolished a financial oversight panel pursuant to 14subsection (c) of this Section, the State Superintendent may 15appoint former members of the panel to the Independent 16Authority. These members may serve as part of the 5 or 7 17members or may be appointed in addition to the 5 or 7 members, 18with the Independent Authority not to exceed 9 members in 19total.20    Members of the Independent Authority must be selected 21primarily on the basis of their experience and knowledge in 22education policy and governance, with consideration given to 23persons knowledgeable in the operation of a school district. A 24member of the Independent Authority must be a registered voter 25as provided in the general election law, must not be a school 26trustee, and must not be a child sex offender as defined in   HB3866- 12 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012. A majority of the 2members of the Independent Authority must be residents of the 3district that the Independent Authority serves. A member of 4the Independent Authority may not be an employee of the 5district, nor may a member have a direct financial interest in 6the district.7    Independent Authority members may be reimbursed by the 8district for travel if they live more than 25 miles away from 9the district's headquarters and other necessary expenses 10incurred in the performance of their official duties. The 11amount reimbursed members for their expenses must be charged 12to the school district.13    With the exception of the Chairperson, the Independent 14Authority may elect such officers as it deems appropriate.15    The first meeting of the Independent Authority must be 16held at the call of the Chairperson. The Independent Authority 17shall prescribe the times and places for its meetings and the 18manner in which regular and special meetings may be called and 19shall comply with the Open Meetings Act.20    All Independent Authority members must complete the 21training required of school board members under Section 10-16a 22of this Code.23    (g) The purpose of the Independent Authority is to operate 24the district. The Independent Authority shall have all of the 25powers and duties of a board and all other powers necessary to 26meet its responsibilities and to carry out its purpose and the   HB3866- 13 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1purposes of this Section and that may be requisite or proper 2for the maintenance, operation, and development of any school 3or schools under the jurisdiction of the Independent 4Authority. This grant of powers does not release an 5Independent Authority from any duty imposed upon it by this 6Code or any other law.7    The Independent Authority shall have no power to 8unilaterally cancel or modify any collective bargaining 9agreement in force upon the date of creation of the 10Independent Authority.11    (h) The Independent Authority may prepare and file with 12the State Superintendent a proposal for emergency financial 13assistance for the school district and for the operations 14budget of the Independent Authority, in accordance with 15Section 1B-8 of this Code. A district may receive both a loan 16and a grant.17    (i) An election for board members must not be held in a 18district upon the establishment of an Independent Authority 19and is suspended until the next regularly scheduled school 20board election that takes place no less than 2 years following 21the establishment of the Independent Authority. For this first 22election, 3 school board members must be elected to serve out 23terms of 4 years and until successors are elected and have 24qualified. Members of the Independent Authority are eligible 25to run for election in the district, provided that they meet 26all other eligibility requirements of Section 10-10 of this   HB3866- 14 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1Code. Following this election, the school board shall consist 2of the newly elected members and any remaining members of the 3Independent Authority. The majority of this board must be 4residents of the district. The State Superintendent must 5appoint new members who are residents to the Independent 6Authority if necessary to maintain this majority. At the next 7school board election, 4 school board members must be elected 8to serve out terms of 4 years and until successors are elected 9and have qualified. For purposes of these first 2 elections, 10the school board members must be elected at-large. In 11districts where board members were previously elected using an 12alternative format pursuant to Article 9 of this Code, 13following these first 2 elections, the voting shall 14automatically revert back to the original form. Following the 15election, any remaining Independent Authority members shall 16serve in the district as an oversight panel until such time as 17the district meets the governance standards necessary to 18achieve accreditation. If some or all of the Independent 19Authority members have been elected to the board, the State 20Superintendent may, in his or her discretion, appoint new 21members to the Independent Authority pursuant to subsection 22(f) of this Section. The school board shall get approval of all 23actions by the Independent Authority during the time the 24Independent Authority serves as an oversight panel.25    Board members who were removed pursuant to subsection (c) 26of this Section are ineligible to run for school board in the   HB3866- 15 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1district for 10 years following the abolition of the 2Independent Authority pursuant to subsection (l) of this 3Section. However, board members who were removed pursuant to 4subsection (c) of this Section and were appointed to the 5Independent Authority by the State Superintendent are eligible 6to run for school board in the district.7    (j) The Independent Authority, upon its members taking 8office and annually thereafter and upon request, shall prepare 9and submit to the State Superintendent a report on the state of 10the district, including without limitation the academic 11improvement and financial situation of the district. This 12report must be submitted annually on or before March 1 of each 13year. The State Superintendent shall provide copies of any and 14all reports to the regional office of education for the 15district and to the State Senator and Representative 16representing the area where the district is located.17    (k) The district shall render such services to and permit 18the use of its facilities and resources by the Independent 19Authority at no charge as may be requested by the Independent 20Authority. Any State agency, unit of local government, or 21school district may, within its lawful powers and duties, 22render such services to the Independent Authority as may be 23requested by the Independent Authority.24    (l) An Independent Authority must be abolished when the 25district, following the election of the full board, meets the 26governance standards necessary to achieve accreditation status   HB3866- 16 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1by an independent accreditation agency chosen by the State 2Board. The abolition of the Independent Authority shall be 3done by the State Board and take place within 30 days after the 4determination of the accreditation agency.5    Upon abolition of the Independent Authority, all powers 6and duties allowed by this Code to be exercised by a school 7board shall be transferred to the elected school board.8    (m) The Independent Authority must be indemnified through 9insurance purchased by the district. The district shall 10purchase insurance through which the Independent Authority is 11to be indemnified.12    The district retains the duty to represent and to 13indemnify Independent Authority members following the 14abolition of the Independent Authority for any cause of action 15or remedy available against the Independent Authority, its 16members, its employees, or its agents for any right or claim 17existing or any liability incurred prior to the abolition.18    The insurance shall indemnify and protect districts, 19Independent Authority members, employees, volunteer personnel 20authorized in Sections 10-22.34, 10-22.34a, and 10-22.34b of 21this Code, mentors of certified or licensed staff as 22authorized in Article 21A and Sections 2-3.53a, 2-3.53b, and 2334-18.33 of this Code, and student teachers against civil 24rights damage claims and suits, constitutional rights damage 25claims and suits, and death and bodily injury and property 26damage claims and suits, including defense thereof, when   HB3866- 17 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1damages are sought for negligent or wrongful acts alleged to 2have been committed in the scope of employment, under the 3direction of the Independent Authority, or related to any 4mentoring services provided to certified or licensed staff of 5the district. Such indemnification and protection shall extend 6to persons who were members of an Independent Authority, 7employees of an Independent Authority, authorized volunteer 8personnel, mentors of certified or licensed staff, or student 9teachers at the time of the incident from which a claim arises. 10No agent may be afforded indemnification or protection unless 11he or she was a member of an Independent Authority, an employee 12of an Independent Authority, an authorized volunteer, a mentor 13of certified or licensed staff, or a student teacher at the 14time of the incident from which the claim arises.15    (n) The State Board may adopt rules as may be necessary for 16the administration of this Section. 17(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23.) 18    (105 ILCS 5/34-4)  (from Ch. 122, par. 34-4)19    Sec. 34-4. Eligibility. To be eligible for election or 20appointment to the Board, a person shall be a citizen of the 21United States, shall be a registered voter as provided in the 22Election Code, shall have been, for a period of one year 23immediately before election or appointment, a resident of the 24city, district, and subdistrict that the member represents, 25and shall not be a child sex offender as defined in Section   HB3866- 18 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b111-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012. A person is ineligible for 2election or appointment to the Board if that person is not in 3compliance with the provisions of Section 10-9 as referenced 4in Section 34-3. For the 2024 general election, all persons 5eligible for election to the Board shall be nominated by a 6petition signed by at least 1,000 but not more than 3,000 of 7the voters residing within the electoral district on a 8petition in order to be placed on the ballot. For the 2026 9general election and general elections thereafter, persons 10eligible for election to the Board shall be nominated by a 11petition signed by at least 500 but no more than 1,500 voters 12residing within the subdistrict on a petition in order to be 13placed on the ballot, except that persons eligible for 14election to the Board at large shall be nominated by a petition 15signed by no less than 2,500 voters residing within the city. 16Any registered voter may sign a nominating petition, 17irrespective of any partisan petition the voter signs or may 18sign. For the 2024 general election only, the petition 19circulation period shall begin on March 26, 2024, and the 20filing period shall be from June 17, 2024 to June 24, 2024. 21Permanent removal from the city by any member of the Board 22during the member's term of office constitutes a resignation 23therefrom and creates a vacancy in the Board. Board members 24shall serve without any compensation; however, members of the 25Board shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred while in the 26performance of their duties upon submission of proper receipts   HB3866- 19 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1or upon submission of a signed voucher in the case of an 2expense allowance evidencing the amount of such reimbursement 3or allowance to the President of the Board for verification 4and approval. Board members shall not hold other public office 5under the Federal, State or any local government other than 6that of Director of the Regional Transportation Authority, 7member of the economic development commission of a city having 8a population exceeding 500,000, notary public or member of the 9National Guard, and by accepting any such office while members 10of the Board, or by not resigning any such office held at the 11time of being elected or appointed to the Board within 30 days 12after such election or appointment, shall be deemed to have 13vacated their membership in the Board.14(Source: P.A. 102-177, eff. 6-1-22; 102-691, eff. 12-17-21; 15103-584, eff. 3-18-24.) 16    Section 20. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 17changing Section 11-9.3 as follows: 18    (720 ILCS 5/11-9.3)19    Sec. 11-9.3. Presence within school zone by child sex 20offenders prohibited; approaching, contacting, residing with, 21or communicating with a child within certain places by child 22sex offenders prohibited.23    (a) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly be 24present in any school building, on real property comprising   HB3866- 20 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1any school, or in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted 2by a school to transport students to or from school or a school 3related activity when persons under the age of 18 are present 4in the building, on the grounds or in the conveyance, unless 5the offender is a parent or guardian of a student attending the 6school and the parent or guardian is: (i) attending a 7conference at the school with school personnel to discuss the 8progress of his or her child academically or socially, (ii) 9participating in child review conferences in which evaluation 10and placement decisions may be made with respect to his or her 11child regarding special education services, or (iii) attending 12conferences to discuss other student issues concerning his or 13her child such as retention and promotion and notifies the 14principal of the school of his or her presence at the school or 15unless the offender has permission to be present from the 16superintendent or the school board or in the case of a private 17school from the principal. In the case of a public school, if 18permission is granted, the superintendent or school board 19president must inform the principal of the school where the 20sex offender will be present. Notification includes the nature 21of the sex offender's visit and the hours in which the sex 22offender will be present in the school. The sex offender is 23responsible for notifying the principal's office when he or 24she arrives on school property and when he or she departs from 25school property. If the sex offender is to be present in the 26vicinity of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain   HB3866- 21 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1under the direct supervision of a school official.2    (a-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 3be present within 100 feet of a site posted as a pick-up or 4discharge stop for a conveyance owned, leased, or contracted 5by a school to transport students to or from school or a school 6related activity when one or more persons under the age of 18 7are present at the site. 8    (a-10) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 9knowingly be present in any public park building, a playground 10or recreation area within any publicly accessible privately 11owned building, or on real property comprising any public park 12when persons under the age of 18 are present in the building or 13on the grounds and to approach, contact, or communicate with a 14child under 18 years of age, unless the offender is a parent or 15guardian of a person under 18 years of age present in the 16building or on the grounds. 17    (b) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 18loiter within 500 feet of a school building or real property 19comprising any school while persons under the age of 18 are 20present in the building or on the grounds, unless the offender 21is a parent or guardian of a student attending the school and 22the parent or guardian is: (i) attending a conference at the 23school with school personnel to discuss the progress of his or 24her child academically or socially, (ii) participating in 25child review conferences in which evaluation and placement 26decisions may be made with respect to his or her child   HB3866- 22 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1regarding special education services, or (iii) attending 2conferences to discuss other student issues concerning his or 3her child such as retention and promotion and notifies the 4principal of the school of his or her presence at the school or 5has permission to be present from the superintendent or the 6school board or in the case of a private school from the 7principal. In the case of a public school, if permission is 8granted, the superintendent or school board president must 9inform the principal of the school where the sex offender will 10be present. Notification includes the nature of the sex 11offender's visit and the hours in which the sex offender will 12be present in the school. The sex offender is responsible for 13notifying the principal's office when he or she arrives on 14school property and when he or she departs from school 15property. If the sex offender is to be present in the vicinity 16of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain under the 17direct supervision of a school official.18    (b-2) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 19loiter on a public way within 500 feet of a public park 20building or real property comprising any public park while 21persons under the age of 18 are present in the building or on 22the grounds and to approach, contact, or communicate with a 23child under 18 years of age, unless the offender is a parent or 24guardian of a person under 18 years of age present in the 25building or on the grounds. 26    (b-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly   HB3866- 23 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1reside within 500 feet of a school building or the real 2property comprising any school that persons under the age of 318 attend. Nothing in this subsection (b-5) prohibits a child 4sex offender from residing within 500 feet of a school 5building or the real property comprising any school that 6persons under 18 attend if the property is owned by the child 7sex offender and was purchased before July 7, 2000 (the 8effective date of Public Act 91-911).9    (b-10) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 10knowingly reside within 500 feet of a playground, child care 11institution, day care center, part day child care facility, 12day care home, group day care home, or a facility providing 13programs or services exclusively directed toward persons under 1418 years of age. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) prohibits a 15child sex offender from residing within 500 feet of a 16playground or a facility providing programs or services 17exclusively directed toward persons under 18 years of age if 18the property is owned by the child sex offender and was 19purchased before July 7, 2000. Nothing in this subsection 20(b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from residing within 500 21feet of a child care institution, day care center, or part day 22child care facility if the property is owned by the child sex 23offender and was purchased before June 26, 2006. Nothing in 24this subsection (b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from 25residing within 500 feet of a day care home or group day care 26home if the property is owned by the child sex offender and was   HB3866- 24 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1purchased before August 14, 2008 (the effective date of Public 2Act 95-821). 3    (b-15) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 4knowingly reside within 500 feet of the victim of the sex 5offense. Nothing in this subsection (b-15) prohibits a child 6sex offender from residing within 500 feet of the victim if the 7property in which the child sex offender resides is owned by 8the child sex offender and was purchased before August 22, 92002. 10    This subsection (b-15) does not apply if the victim of the 11sex offense is 21 years of age or older. 12    (b-20) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 13knowingly communicate, other than for a lawful purpose under 14Illinois law, using the Internet or any other digital media, 15with a person under 18 years of age or with a person whom he or 16she believes to be a person under 18 years of age, unless the 17offender is a parent or guardian of the person under 18 years 18of age. 19    (c) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 20operate, manage, be employed by, volunteer at, be associated 21with, or knowingly be present at any: (i) facility providing 22programs or services exclusively directed toward persons under 23the age of 18; (ii) day care center; (iii) part day child care 24facility; (iv) child care institution; (v) school providing 25before and after school programs for children under 18 years 26of age; (vi) day care home; or (vii) group day care home. This   HB3866- 25 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1does not prohibit a child sex offender from owning the real 2property upon which the programs or services are offered or 3upon which the day care center, part day child care facility, 4child care institution, or school providing before and after 5school programs for children under 18 years of age is located, 6provided the child sex offender refrains from being present on 7the premises for the hours during which: (1) the programs or 8services are being offered or (2) the day care center, part day 9child care facility, child care institution, or school 10providing before and after school programs for children under 1118 years of age, day care home, or group day care home is 12operated. 13    (c-2) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 14participate in a holiday event involving children under 18 15years of age, including but not limited to distributing candy 16or other items to children on Halloween, wearing a Santa Claus 17costume on or preceding Christmas, being employed as a 18department store Santa Claus, or wearing an Easter Bunny 19costume on or preceding Easter. For the purposes of this 20subsection, child sex offender has the meaning as defined in 21this Section, but does not include as a sex offense under 22paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Section, the offense 23under subsection (c) of Section 11-1.50 of this Code. This 24subsection does not apply to a child sex offender who is a 25parent or guardian of children under 18 years of age that are 26present in the home and other non-familial minors are not   HB3866- 26 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1present.2    (c-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 3operate, manage, be employed by, or be associated with any 4carnival, amusement enterprise, or county or State fair when 5persons under the age of 18 are present. 6    (c-6) It is unlawful for a child sex offender who owns and 7resides at residential real estate to knowingly rent any 8residential unit within the same building in which he or she 9resides to a person who is the parent or guardian of a child or 10children under 18 years of age. This subsection shall apply 11only to leases or other rental arrangements entered into after 12January 1, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 95-820).13    (c-7) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 14offer or provide any programs or services to persons under 18 15years of age in his or her residence or the residence of 16another or in any facility for the purpose of offering or 17providing such programs or services, whether such programs or 18services are offered or provided by contract, agreement, 19arrangement, or on a volunteer basis.20    (c-8) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 21operate, whether authorized to do so or not, any of the 22following vehicles: (1) a vehicle which is specifically 23designed, constructed or modified and equipped to be used for 24the retail sale of food or beverages, including but not 25limited to an ice cream truck; (2) an authorized emergency 26vehicle; or (3) a rescue vehicle.   HB3866- 27 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1    (d) Definitions. In this Section:2        (1) "Sex offender" has the meaning ascribed to the 3    term in Section 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Act. 4    "Child sex offender" means any person who:5            (i) has been charged under Illinois law, or any 6        substantially similar federal law or law of another 7        state, with a sex offense set forth in paragraph (2) of 8        this subsection (d) or the attempt to commit an 9        included sex offense, and the victim is a person under 10        18 years of age at the time of the offense; and:11                (A) is convicted of such offense or an attempt 12            to commit such offense; or13                (B) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 14            of such offense or an attempt to commit such 15            offense; or16                (C) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 17            pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 104-25 of 18            the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 of such 19            offense or an attempt to commit such offense; or20                (D) is the subject of a finding not resulting 21            in an acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 22            subsection (a) of Section 104-25 of the Code of 23            Criminal Procedure of 1963 for the alleged 24            commission or attempted commission of such 25            offense; or26                (E) is found not guilty by reason of insanity   HB3866- 28 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1            following a hearing conducted pursuant to a 2            federal law or the law of another state 3            substantially similar to subsection (c) of Section 4            104-25 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 5            of such offense or of the attempted commission of 6            such offense; or7                (F) is the subject of a finding not resulting 8            in an acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 9            a federal law or the law of another state 10            substantially similar to subsection (a) of Section 11            104-25 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 12            for the alleged violation or attempted commission 13            of such offense; or14            (ii) is certified as a sexually dangerous person 15        pursuant to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons 16        Act, or any substantially similar federal law or the 17        law of another state, when any conduct giving rise to 18        such certification is committed or attempted against a 19        person less than 18 years of age; or20            (iii) is subject to the provisions of Section 2 of 21        the Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous 22        Persons Act.23        Convictions that result from or are connected with the 24    same act, or result from offenses committed at the same 25    time, shall be counted for the purpose of this Section as 26    one conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law   HB3866- 29 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1    is not a conviction for purposes of this Section.2        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2.5), 3    "sex offense" means:4            (i) A violation of any of the following Sections 5        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 6        2012: 10-4 (forcible detention), 10-7 (aiding or 7        abetting child abduction under Section 10-5(b)(10)), 8        10-5(b)(10) (child luring), 11-1.40 (predatory 9        criminal sexual assault of a child), 11-6 (indecent 10        solicitation of a child), 11-6.5 (indecent 11        solicitation of an adult), 11-9.1 (sexual exploitation 12        of a child), 11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 13        11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a 14        disability), 11-11 (sexual relations within families), 15        11-14.3(a)(1) (promoting prostitution by advancing 16        prostitution), 11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting 17        prostitution by profiting from prostitution by 18        compelling a person to be a prostitute), 19        11-14.3(a)(2)(C) (promoting prostitution by profiting 20        from prostitution by means other than as described in 21        subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of 22        subsection (a) of Section 11-14.3), 11-14.4 (promoting 23        juvenile prostitution), 11-18.1 (patronizing a 24        juvenile prostitute), 11-20.1 (child pornography), 25        11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography), 11-21 26        (harmful material), 11-25 (grooming), 11-26 (traveling   HB3866- 30 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1        to meet a minor or traveling to meet a child), 12-33 2        (ritualized abuse of a child), 11-20 (obscenity) (when 3        that offense was committed in any school, on real 4        property comprising any school, in any conveyance 5        owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 6        students to or from school or a school related 7        activity, or in a public park), 11-30 (public 8        indecency) (when committed in a school, on real 9        property comprising a school, in any conveyance owned, 10        leased, or contracted by a school to transport 11        students to or from school or a school related 12        activity, or in a public park). An attempt to commit 13        any of these offenses.14            (ii) A violation of any of the following Sections 15        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 16        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of 17        age: 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 11-1.30 18        (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 11-1.50 19        (criminal sexual abuse), 11-1.60 (aggravated criminal 20        sexual abuse). An attempt to commit any of these 21        offenses.22            (iii) A violation of any of the following Sections 23        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 24        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of age 25        and the defendant is not a parent of the victim:26            10-1 (kidnapping),  HB3866- 31 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),2            10-3 (unlawful restraint),3            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint),4            11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a child). 5            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.6            (iv) A violation of any former law of this State 7        substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 8        clause (2)(i) or (2)(ii) of subsection (d) of this 9        Section.10        (2.5) For the purposes of subsections (b-5) and (b-10) 11    only, a sex offense means:12            (i) A violation of any of the following Sections 13        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 14        2012:15             10-5(b)(10) (child luring), 10-7 (aiding or 16        abetting child abduction under Section 10-5(b)(10)), 17        11-1.40 (predatory criminal sexual assault of a 18        child), 11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child), 19        11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult), 11-9.2 20        (custodial sexual misconduct), 11-9.5 (sexual 21        misconduct with a person with a disability), 11-11 22        (sexual relations within families), 11-14.3(a)(1) 23        (promoting prostitution by advancing prostitution), 24        11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting prostitution by profiting 25        from prostitution by compelling a person to be a 26        prostitute), 11-14.3(a)(2)(C) (promoting prostitution   HB3866- 32 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1        by profiting from prostitution by means other than as 2        described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph 3        (2) of subsection (a) of Section 11-14.3), 11-14.4 4        (promoting juvenile prostitution), 11-18.1 5        (patronizing a juvenile prostitute), 11-20.1 (child 6        pornography), 11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography), 7        11-25 (grooming), 11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or 8        traveling to meet a child), or 12-33 (ritualized abuse 9        of a child). An attempt to commit any of these 10        offenses.11            (ii) A violation of any of the following Sections 12        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 13        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of 14        age: 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 11-1.30 15        (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 11-1.60 16        (aggravated criminal sexual abuse), and subsection (a) 17        of Section 11-1.50 (criminal sexual abuse). An attempt 18        to commit any of these offenses.19            (iii) A violation of any of the following Sections 20        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 21        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of age 22        and the defendant is not a parent of the victim:23            10-1 (kidnapping),24            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),25            10-3 (unlawful restraint),26            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint),  HB3866- 33 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1            11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a child). 2            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.3            (iv) A violation of any former law of this State 4        substantially equivalent to any offense listed in this 5        paragraph (2.5) of this subsection.6        (3) A conviction for an offense of federal law or the 7    law of another state that is substantially equivalent to 8    any offense listed in paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 9    this Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose 10    of this Section. A finding or adjudication as a sexually 11    dangerous person under any federal law or law of another 12    state that is substantially equivalent to the Sexually 13    Dangerous Persons Act shall constitute an adjudication for 14    the purposes of this Section.15        (4) "Authorized emergency vehicle", "rescue vehicle", 16    and "vehicle" have the meanings ascribed to them in 17    Sections 1-105, 1-171.8 and 1-217, respectively, of the 18    Illinois Vehicle Code. 19        (5) "Child care institution" has the meaning ascribed 20    to it in Section 2.06 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 21        (6) "Day care center" has the meaning ascribed to it 22    in Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 23        (7) "Day care home" has the meaning ascribed to it in 24    Section 2.18 of the Child Care Act of 1969.25        (8) "Facility providing programs or services directed 26    towards persons under the age of 18" means any facility   HB3866- 34 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1    providing programs or services exclusively directed 2    towards persons under the age of 18.3        (9) "Group day care home" has the meaning ascribed to 4    it in Section 2.20 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 5        (10) "Internet" has the meaning set forth in Section 6    16-0.1 of this Code. 7        (11) "Loiter" means:8            (i) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 9        person is in a vehicle, or remaining in or around 10        school or public park property.11            (ii) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 12        person is in a vehicle, or remaining in or around 13        school or public park property, for the purpose of 14        committing or attempting to commit a sex offense.15            (iii) Entering or remaining in a building in or 16        around school property, other than the offender's 17        residence.18        (12) "Part day child care facility" has the meaning 19    ascribed to it in Section 2.10 of the Child Care Act of 20    1969. 21        (13) "Playground" means a piece of land owned or 22    controlled by a unit of local government that is 23    designated by the unit of local government for use solely 24    or primarily for children's recreation. 25        (14) "Public park" includes a park, forest preserve, 26    bikeway, trail, or conservation area under the   HB3866- 35 -LRB104 12337 RLC 22516 b1    jurisdiction of the State or a unit of local government. 2        (15) "School" means a public or private preschool or 3    elementary or secondary school. 4        (16) "School official" means the principal, a teacher, 5    or any other certified employee of the school, the 6    superintendent of schools or a member of the school board.7    (e) For the purposes of this Section, the 500 feet 8distance shall be measured from: (1) the edge of the property 9of the school building or the real property comprising the 10school that is closest to the edge of the property of the child 11sex offender's residence or where he or she is loitering, and 12(2) the edge of the property comprising the public park 13building or the real property comprising the public park, 14playground, child care institution, day care center, part day 15child care facility, or facility providing programs or 16services exclusively directed toward persons under 18 years of 17age, or a victim of the sex offense who is under 21 years of 18age, to the edge of the child sex offender's place of residence 19or place where he or she is loitering. 20    (f) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty 21of a Class 4 felony.22(Source: P.A. 102-997, eff. 1-1-23.)